Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF929.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.89, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given them. (b) "Gross annual receipts" means the total amount derived from residential contracting or residential remodeling activities, regardless of where the activities are performed, and must not be reduced by costs of goods sold, expenses, losses, or any other amount. (c) "Licensee" means a person licensed as a residential contractor or residential remodeler. (d) "Residential real estate" means a new or existing building constructed for habitation by one to four families, and includes detached garages intended for storage of vehicles associated with the residential real estatenew text begin , and private residential pools connected with the residential real estate, which are controlled and used by the owner or the owner's family or invited guests and are not used as part of a businessnew text end . (e) "Fund" means the contractor recovery fund. (f) "Owner" when used in connection with real property, means a person who has any legal or equitable interest in real property and includes a condominium or townhome association that owns common property located in a condominium building or townhome building or an associated detached garage. Owner does not include any real estate developer or any owner using, or intending to use, the property for a business purpose and not as owner-occupied residential real estate. (g) "Cycle One" means the time period between July 1 and December 31. (h) "Cycle Two" means the time period between January 1 and June 30.